Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.238

Career and technical education equipment—Competitive grant process—Rules.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish a competitive grant process for school districts to apply for grants for the purpose of purchasing career and technical education equipment.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules for the grant program established under this section.

(3) Competitive grants awarded under this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated by the state for this specific purpose.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 411.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.